Utah statutes.
53B-17-701.   Utah Museum of Fine Arts.

(1)  There is established at the University of Utah the Utah Museum of Fine Arts as:

(a)  a state general and multicultural art museum; and

(b)  a state institution charged with the broad responsibility of collecting and exhibiting, for the education and enrichment of its citizens, art and related objects from around the world from prehistoric times to the present.

(2)  The museum shall:

(a)  serve as a repository in Utah of the objects referred to in Subsection (1);

(b)  collect and display tangible art objects that reflect the past, present, and continuing development of the visual arts in America and throughout the rest of the world;

(c)  provide professional expertise and assistance in the proper care of the tangible art objects displayed at the museum; and

(d)  engage visitors to the museum in discovering meaningful connections with the artistic expressions of the world's cultures by:

(i)  acting as a responsible steward of the material legacy of the visual arts located at the Utah Museum of Fine Arts for the people of Utah;

(ii)  serving as a teaching, learning, and research resource for the University of Utah, the state's greater educational community, and the general public;

(iii)  promoting an open dialogue with visitors and the community about the role of visual arts in our society;

(iv)  fostering and celebrating the diverse artistic expressions and accomplishments of the people of Utah and around the world;

(v)  cultivating community partnerships and collaborations to ensure that the visual arts reach a broad spectrum of the general public; and

(vi)  offering a wide range of experiences that will enable visitors to the museum to explore the variety of ways the arts can inform and enhance the human experience.

